Utah statutes.
10-7-85.   Support of the arts.
The governing body of any municipality may provide for and appropriate funds
for the support of the arts, including music, dance, theatre, crafts and
visual, folk and literary art, for the purpose of enriching the lives of its
residents and may establish guidelines for the support of the arts.
